District of Columbia statutes.
31-2501.02

Applicability of chapter.

All fire, marine, and casualty insurance companies now or hereafter incorporated or formed in the District or authorized to do business in the District, all brokers and all agents and other representatives of such companies shall, to the extent hereinafter provided, be subject to this chapter; provided, that this chapter shall not affect the business of life and title insurance, and shall not affect the right or authority of any solvent company to make contracts of fidelity or surety, and shall not affect a plan under which any person provides pension benefits to his employees.

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1064, ch. 792, ch. I, § 2
1981 Ed., § 35-1502.
1973 Ed., § 35-1302.